Indiana, session 2026, HB1269.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 35-50-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
2 AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
3 JULY 1, 2026]:
4 Chapter 9.5. Additional Sentence Requirements
5 Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "prostitution offender program"
6 means an instructional program that provides information
7 concerning the following:
8 (1) The causes of prostitution and its relationship to human
9 trafficking.
10 (2) Health risks associated with prostitution.
11 (3) The penalties for convictions related to making an
12 unlawful proposition.
13 (4) The effect of human trafficking on victims.
14 Sec. 2. At the time of sentencing for a person convicted of
15 making an unlawful proposition under IC 35-45-4-3, the court may
16 require the person to complete a prostitution offender program
17 approved by the court.
HB 1269—LS 6575/DI 151

2
1 Sec. 3. (a) A person required to complete a prostitution offender
2 program under section 2 of this chapter shall pay a prostitution
3 offender program fee of three hundred dollars ($300).
4 (b) The clerk of the court shall distribute the fee as follows:
5 (1) Two hundred dollars ($200) to the state comptroller for
6 deposit in the human trafficking prevention and victim
7 assistance fund established by IC 5-2-6-25.
8 (2) One hundred dollars ($100) to the law enforcement agency
9 that arrested the person described in subsection (a).
10 Sec. 4. (a) This section applies to a prostitution offender
11 program that is operated by a county.
12 (b) In addition to the fee required under section 3 of this
13 chapter, a person required to complete a prostitution offender
14 program under section 2 of this chapter that is operated by the
15 county shall pay a county prostitution offender program fee of two
16 hundred dollars ($200).
17 (c) The clerk of the court shall distribute one hundred percent
18 (100%) of the fee collected under this section to the county auditor
19 for deposit in the county general fund. Money deposited in the
20 county general fund under this section shall be allocated to defray
21 the expenses of participation in the prostitution offender program.
HB 1269—LS 6575/DI 151

3
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Courts and Criminal Code, to
which was referred House Bill 1269, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1269 as introduced.)
MCNAMARA
Committee Vote: Yeas 13, Nays 0
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1269 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 1, after line 17, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 3. (a) A person required to complete a prostitution
offender program under section 2 of this chapter shall pay a
prostitution offender program fee of three hundred dollars ($300).
(b) The clerk of the court shall distribute the fee as follows:
(1) Two hundred dollars ($200) to the state comptroller for
deposit in the human trafficking prevention and victim
assistance fund established by IC 5-2-6-25.
(2) One hundred dollars ($100) to the law enforcement agency
that arrested the person described in subsection (a).
Sec. 4. (a) This section applies to a prostitution offender
program that is operated by a county.
(b) In addition to the fee required under section 3 of this
chapter, a person required to complete a prostitution offender
program under section 2 of this chapter that is operated by the
county shall pay a county prostitution offender program fee of two
hundred dollars ($200).
(c) The clerk of the court shall distribute one hundred percent
(100%) of the fee collected under this section to the county auditor
for deposit in the county general fund. Money deposited in the
county general fund under this section shall be allocated to defray
the expenses of participation in the prostitution offender
program.".
Delete page 2.
(Reference is to HB 1269 as printed January 22, 2026.)
MELTZER
HB 1269—LS 6575/DI 151